Utah statutes.
70D-3-501.   Disciplinary action.

(1)  The commissioner may through an adjudicative proceeding subject to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, impose a sanction described in Subsection (2) against an individual if the individual:

(a)  is licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter; and

(b)  violates this chapter.

(2)  The commissioner may against an individual described in Subsection (1) who violates this chapter:

(a)  impose an educational requirement;

(b)  impose a civil penalty against the individual in an amount not to exceed the greater of:

(i)  $2,500 for each violation; or

(ii)  the amount equal to any gain or economic benefit derived from each violation;

(c)  deny an application for an initial license;

(d)  do any of the following to a license under this chapter:

(i)  suspend;

(ii)  revoke;

(iii)  place on probation;

(iv)  deny renewal;

(v)  deny reinstatement;

(vi)  in the case of a denial of a license, set a waiting period for an individual to apply for a license under this chapter; or

(vii)  issue a cease and desist order; or

(e)  impose a combination of sanctions described in this Subsection (2).

(3) (a)  If the commissioner determines that a practice that the commissioner alleges is unlawful should be enjoined during the pendency of a proceeding incident to an allegation, the commissioner may issue a temporary order in accordance with Section 63G-4-502:

(i)  at the commencement of the proceedings; or

(ii)  at any time after the proceeding commences.

(b)  For purposes of Section 63G-4-502, an immediate and significant danger to the public health, safety, or welfare exists if the commissioner finds from specific facts supported by sworn statement or the records of a person subject to the order that loan applicants or mortgagors are otherwise likely to suffer immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage before a proceeding incident to a final order can be completed.

